Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 STATE GOVERNMENT AND ELECTIONS APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin STATE GOVERNMENT AND ELECTIONS APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are added to the appropriations in Laws 2025, chapter 39, article 1, to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. Supplemental appropriations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, are effective the day following final enactment unless a different effective date is explicit. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin ATTORNEY GENERAL new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,231,000 new text end Sec. 3. new text begin ADMINISTRATIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 172,000 new text end Sec. 4. new text begin MINNESOTA MANAGEMENT AND BUDGETnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,726,000 new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $2,301,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin REVENUEnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,839,000 new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $2,786,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $2,725,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin RETURN AND CANCELLATION OF TAX-FORFEITED SETTLEMENT APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Return of funds. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Laws 2024, chapter 113, section 1, subdivision 5, on June 29, 2026, the claims administrator appointed under Laws 2024, chapter 113, to settle litigation related to the state's retention of tax-forfeited lands, surplus proceeds from the sale of tax-forfeited lands, and mineral rights in those lands, must return to the commissioner of management and budget the lesser of $40,000,000 or the amount of the appropriation under Laws 2024, chapter 113, section 1, subdivision 5, that is not needed to settle claims under Laws 2024, chapter 113. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Cancellation. new text end new text begin The commissioner of management and budget must cancel the amount received under subdivision 1 to the general fund within one day of receipt of the funds. new text end ARTICLE 2 STATE GOVERNMENT POLICY Section 1. new text begin [3.0841] CODE OF ETHICS FOR THE LEGISLATIVE BRANCH. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Appointing authority" means the house of representatives Rules and Legislative Administration Committee for employees of the house of representatives, the senate Rules and Administration Committee for employees of the senate, and the Legislative Coordinating Commission for the unclassified employees of joint commissions and offices. new text end new text begin (c) "Business" means any corporation, partnership, proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, organization, self-employed individual, or any other legal entity that engages in either nonprofit or profit-making activities. new text end new text begin (d) "Confidential information" means any information obtained under government authority that has not become part of the body of public information and which, if released prematurely or in nonsummary form, may provide an unfair economic advantage to or adversely affect the competitive position of an individual or a business. new text end new text begin (e) "Employee" means all members and all employees of the legislature, legislative committees, or commissions. new text end new text begin (f) "Private interest" means any interest, including but not limited to a financial interest, that pertains to a person or business whereby the person or business would gain a benefit, privilege, exemption, or advantage from the action of a state agency or employee that is not available to the general public. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Acceptance of gifts; favors. new text end new text begin Employees in the course of or in relation to the employees' official duties shall not directly or indirectly receive or agree to receive any payment of expense, compensation, gift, reward, gratuity, favor, service, or promise of future employment or other future benefit from any source except the state for any activity related to the duties of the employee, unless otherwise provided by law. The acceptance of any of the following is not a violation of this subdivision: new text end new text begin (1) gifts of nominal value; new text end new text begin (2) plaques or similar mementos recognizing individual services in a field of specialty or to a charitable cause; new text end new text begin (3) payment of reimbursement expenses for travel or meals, not to exceed actual expenses incurred, that are not reimbursed by the state and have been approved in advance by the appointing authority as part of the work assignment; or new text end new text begin (4) honoraria or expenses paid for papers, talks, demonstrations, or appearances made by employees on their own time for which they are not compensated by the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Use of confidential information. new text end new text begin An employee shall not use confidential information to further the employee's private interest and shall not accept outside employment or involvement in a business or activity that will require the employee to disclose or use confidential information. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Use of state property. new text end new text begin (a) An employee shall not use or allow the use of state time, supplies, or state-owned or leased property and equipment for the employee's private interests or any other use not in the interest of the state, except as provided by law. new text end new text begin (b) Appointing authorities in the legislature shall issue policies on these issues for their employees. The policies shall permit employees to make reasonable use of state time, property, and equipment for personal communications and shall address issues of privacy, content of communications, and the definition of reasonable use as well as other issues the appointing authorities identify as necessary and relevant. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Conflicts of interest. new text end new text begin The following actions by an employee shall be deemed a conflict of interest and are subject to procedures in this section regarding resolution of the conflicts or disciplinary action as appropriate: new text end new text begin (1) use or attempted use of the employee's official position to secure benefits, privileges, exemptions, or advantages for the employee, the employee's immediate family, or an organization with which the employee is associated that are different from those available to the general public; new text end new text begin (2) acceptance of other employment or contractual relationship that will affect the employee's independence of judgment in the exercise of official duties; new text end new text begin (3) actions as an agent or attorney in any action or matter pending before the employing agency, except in the proper discharge of official duties or on the employee's behalf; or new text end new text begin (4) the solicitation of a financial agreement for the employee or entity other than the state when the state is currently engaged in the provision of the services that are the subject of the agreement or where the state has expressed an intention to engage in competition for the provision of the services, unless the affected state agency waives this clause. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Determination of conflicts of interest. new text end new text begin When an employee believes the potential for a conflict of interest exists, it is the employee's duty to avoid the situation. A conflict of interest shall be deemed to exist when a review of the situation by the employee or the appointing authority determines any one of the following conditions to be present: new text end new text begin (1) the use of state time, facilities, equipment, or supplies or the use of a badge, uniform, prestige, or influence of a state office or employment for private gain or advantage; new text end new text begin (2) receipt or acceptance by the employee of any money or other thing of value from anyone other than the state for the performance of an act that the employee would be required or expected to perform in the regular course or hours of state employment or as part of the duties as an employee; new text end new text begin (3) employment by a business which is subject to the direct or indirect control, inspection, review, audit, or enforcement by the employee; or new text end new text begin (4) the performance of an act in a capacity other than the employee's official capacity that may later be subject directly or indirectly to the control, inspection, review, audit, or enforcement by the employee. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Resolution of conflict of interest. new text end new text begin If the employee or appointing authority determines that a conflict of interest exists, the matter shall be assigned to another employee who does not have a conflict of interest. If it is not possible to assign the matter to an employee who does not have a conflict of interest, interested persons shall be notified of the conflict and the employee may proceed with the assignment. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Precedence of chapter 10A. new text end new text begin Where specific provisions of chapter 10A apply to employees and conflict with this section, the provisions of chapter 10A shall apply. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Precedence of section 3.084. new text end new text begin Where specific provisions of section 3.084 apply to employees and conflict with this section, the provisions of section 3.084 shall apply. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Noncompliance. new text end new text begin Any employee who intentionally fails to comply with the provisions of this section shall be subject to disciplinary action and action pursuant to chapter 609, if applicable. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Rulemaking; enforcement. new text end new text begin Appointing authorities must adopt rules to enforce this section. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.02, subdivision 7a, is amended to read: Subd. 7a. Government entity. "Government entity" means new text begin the legislature or new text end a state agency, statewide system, or political subdivision. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.02, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. Responsible authority. (a) "Responsible authority" in a state agency or statewide system means the state official designated by law or by the commissioner as the individual responsible for the collection, use and dissemination of any set of data on individuals, government data, or summary data. (b) "Responsible authority" in any political subdivision means the individual designated by the governing body of that political subdivision as the individual responsible for the collection, use, and dissemination of any set of data on individuals, government data, or summary data, unless otherwise provided by state law. new text begin "Responsible authority" in the legislature means the chair of the Legislative Coordinating Commission, the secretary of the senate, and the chief clerk of the house of representatives. new text end Until an individual is designated by the political subdivision's governing body, the responsible authority is: (1) for counties, the county coordinator or administrator. If the county does not employ a coordinator or administrator, the responsible authority is the county auditor; (2) for statutory or home rule charter cities, the elected or appointed city clerk. If the home rule charter does not provide for an office of city clerk, the responsible authority is the chief clerical officer for filing and record keeping purposes; (3) for school districts, the superintendent; and (4) for all other political subdivisions, the chief clerical officer for filing and record keeping purposes. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.605, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Legislative and budget proposal data. (a) Definition. As used in this section, "state administration" means the governor's office, the Department of Management and Budget, and any state agency that is under the direct control of the governor. (b) Classifications. Legislative and budget proposals, including preliminary drafts, that are created, collected, or maintained by the state administration new text begin or the legislature new text end are protected nonpublic data. After the budget is presented to the legislature by the state administration, supporting datanew text begin maintained by state administrationnew text end , including agency requests, are public data.new text begin After the legislature or a legislator introduces a proposal impacting the state budget, supporting data maintained by the legislature or a legislator are public data.new text end Supporting data do not include preliminary drafts. The state administration may disclose any of the data within the state administration and to the public at any time if disclosure would aid the administration in considering and preparing its proposals.new text begin The legislature may disclose any legislative or budget proposals within the legislature if disclosure would aid in considering and preparing its proposals.new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [16A.402] CASH TRANSACTION ROUNDING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Authorization to round cash transactions. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an agency entering into any transaction with a person that results in a payment or transfer of cash between the parties to the transaction may round the payment in the following manner: new text end new text begin (1) in any case in which the total transaction amount ends with 1 cent, 2 cents, 6 cents, or 7 cents as the final digit, the amount of cents in the sum shall be rounded down to the nearest amount divisible by 5; new text end new text begin (2) in any case in which the total transaction amount ends with 3 cents, 4 cents, 8 cents, or 9 cents as the final digit, the amount of cents in the sum shall be rounded up to the nearest amount divisible by 5; or new text end new text begin (3) notwithstanding clause (1), transactions in which the transaction total is $0.01 or $0.02 shall be rounded up to $0.05. new text end new text begin (b) A party authorized to engage in a transaction on behalf of an agency may round the payment in the manner directed by the agency consistent with this section. new text end new text begin (c) This section does not apply to a transaction for which payment is made by electronic fund transfer, check, gift card, money order, credit card, or other similar instrument or method. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Policy posted. new text end new text begin An agency that engages in cash transactions must establish a policy for rounding cash transactions consistent with this section and post the policy at each location where cash transactions occur. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.98, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Grant recipients. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding a later enacted provision specific to an appropriation, a mandate to direct funds to a specified or uniquely qualified person is not valid. new text end new text begin (b) This subdivision does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) general obligation grants as defined in section 16A.695, capital project grants to political subdivisions as defined in section 16A.86, or capital project grants otherwise subject to section 16A.642; new text end new text begin (2) grants for allowable activities under the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 14 and 15; or new text end new text begin (3) grants to Minnesota Tribal governments as defined in section 10.65, subdivision 2, or political subdivisions as defined in section 465.719. new text end new text begin (c) This subdivision applies to appropriations beginning in fiscal year 2028. Pursuant to section 16A.11 and for budgets submitted to the legislature, the commissioner of management and budget shall adjust the appropriation base for appropriations that direct funds to a specified or uniquely qualified person in a manner that ensures compliance with this subdivision and supports a competitive grant process. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.981, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Financial information required; determination of ability to perform. For grants of $50,000 or more and subject to sections 16B.97 and 16B.98, before an agency awards a competitive, legislatively named, single-source, or sole-source grant, the agency must complete a preaward risk assessment to assess the risk that a potential grantee cannot or would not perform the required duties. In making this assessment, the agency must review the following information as applicable: (1) the potential grantee's history of performing duties similar to those required by the grant, whether the grant requires the potential grantee to perform services at a significantly increased scale, and whether the grant will require significant changes to the operation of the potential grantee's organization; (2) for a potential grantee that is a nonprofit organization, the potential grantee's most recent Form 990 or Form 990-EZ filed with the Internal Revenue Service. If the potential grantee has not been in existence long enough or is not required to file Form 990 or Form 990-EZ, the potential grantee must demonstrate to the agency's satisfaction that the potential grantee is exempt and must instead submit the potential grantee's most recent board-reviewed financial statements and documentation of internal controls or, if there is no such board, by the applicant's managing group; (3) for a potential grantee that is a for-profit business, the potential grantee's most recent federal and state tax returns, current financial statements, certification that the business is not under bankruptcy proceedings, and disclosure of any liens on its assets. If a business has not been in business long enough to have a tax return, the grantee must demonstrate to the agency's satisfaction that the grantee has appropriate internal financial controls; (4) evidence of good standing with the secretary of state under chapter 317A, or other applicable law; (5) if the potential grantee is required to complete an audit under section 309.53, subdivision 3, the potential grantee's most recent audit report performed by an independent third party in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles; and (6) certification, provided by the potential grantee, that deleted text begin nonedeleted text end new text begin allnew text end of its current principals deleted text begin have been convicted of a felony financial crime in the last ten yearsdeleted text end new text begin meet applicable responsibility requirements as defined in section 16C.02, subdivision 14anew text end . For new text begin purposes of new text end this section, a principal is defined as a public official, a board member, or staff with the authority to access funds provided by this agency or determine how those funds are used. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16C.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6c. new text end new text begin Debarment. new text end new text begin "Debarment" means the disqualification of a vendor or related entity by the Director of the Office of State Procurement from receiving solicitations, an award of a contract by a governmental unit, or selling any products or services to state agencies for a specified time commensurate with the seriousness of the offense, the failure, or the inadequacy of performance. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16C.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10b. new text end new text begin Related entity. new text end new text begin "Related entity" means a vendor that: new text end new text begin (1) is a firm, partnership, corporation, joint venture, or other legal entity substantially under the control of a vendor; new text end new text begin (2) is a subsidiary of a vendor; new text end new text begin (3) is a person, firm, partnership, corporation, joint venture, or other legal entity that substantially controls a contractor or vendor; or new text end new text begin (4) shares three or more of the following with a vendor doing business with the state: new text end new text begin (i) has one or more of the same owners, principals, officers, or managers; new text end new text begin (ii) has one or more of the same telephone or fax numbers; new text end new text begin (iii) has one or more of the same email addresses, business addresses, or websites; new text end new text begin (iv) employs or engages substantially the same individuals; new text end new text begin (v) utilizes substantially the same vehicles, facilities, or equipment; or new text end new text begin (vi) lists or advertises substantially the same project experience and portfolio of work. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16C.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 14a. new text end new text begin Responsibility. new text end new text begin "Responsibility" or "responsible vendor" means a person who has demonstrated integrity, reliability, quality, fitness, capacity, and experience to satisfactorily perform. Responsibility factors include the ability to demonstrate: new text end new text begin (1) adequate financial, physical, personnel, or other resources or the ability to obtain them; new text end new text begin (2) a satisfactory record of performance, integrity, and reliability; new text end new text begin (3) that it is qualified legally to contract and do business within the state; new text end new text begin (4) it has supplied all necessary information concerning its responsibility; new text end new text begin (5) it meets any other specific criteria for a particular award, provided, as applicable, that the criteria is in the solicitation and is otherwise in conformity with law; new text end new text begin (6) that it, or a related entity, is not currently suspended, debarred or formerly debarred, and not reinstated by the federal government or the state of Minnesota or any of its departments, commissions, agencies, or political subdivisions that have authority to debar; new text end new text begin (7) that none of its owners, officers, directors, managers, controlling parties, or related entities have been convicted of a felony financial crime in the last three years. Felony financial crimes include felony convictions under section 609.445, 609.465, 609.466, 609.52, 609.611, 609.651, 609.7475, or 609.821, any successor provisions, or any convictions under state, federal, or another state's statutes on embezzlement, theft, forgery, bribery, falsification, or destruction of records, receiving stolen property, or any other offense indicating a lack of business integrity; and new text end new text begin (8) that all subcontractors or subrecipients have verified through a signed statement under oath by an owner or officer that they meet the minimum criteria listed in clauses (1) to (7). new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16C.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 19a. new text end new text begin Suspension. new text end new text begin "Suspension" means the temporary suspension of a vendor or related entity by the director of the Office of State Procurement, from receiving solicitations, the award of a contract, or selling any products or services to state agencies while the director determines if there is probable cause for debarment. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16C.06, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Awards. (a) Contract awards shall be made utilizing requests for bids, requests for proposals, reverse auctions as provided in section 16C.10, subdivision 7, or other methods provided by law, unless a section of law requires a particular method of acquisition to be used. The determination of the acquisition method and all decisions involved in the acquisition process, unless otherwise provided for by law, shall be determined by the commissioner. The commissioner is authorized to utilize tools, including but not limited to contract consolidation, product standardization, and mandatory-use enterprise contracts to the extent determined to be in the best interest of the state. (b) Awards based on competitive proposals must include an evaluation of price and other considerations, such as environmental considerations, quality, and vendor performance. The solicitation document used to obtain competitive proposals must state the relative importance of price and the other factors. (c) Awards based on a low bid process must be made to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder, taking into consideration conformity with the specifications, terms of delivery, the purpose for which the contract or purchase is intended, the status and capability of the vendor, and other considerations imposed in the request for bids. The commissioner may decide which is the lowest responsible bidder for all purchases and may use the principles of life-cycle costing, where appropriate, in determining the lowest overall bid. new text begin (d) A vendor is not eligible to receive an award unless the responsibility requirements, as defined in section 16C.02, subdivision 14a, and other applicable laws are met. The commissioner may establish additional factors defining responsibility if it is determined to be in the best interest of the state. A false statement of compliance with any of the criteria in section 16C.02, subdivision 14a, defining responsibility may result in ineligibility or termination of a contract awarded to a prime contractor or a subcontractor and may result in suspension or debarment proceedings. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 15, 2027, and applies to all solicitations issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 43A.23, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. General. (a) The commissioner is authorized to request proposals or to negotiate and to enter into contracts with parties which in the judgment of the commissioner are best qualified to provide service to the benefit plans. Contracts entered into are not subject to the requirements of sections 16C.16 to 16C.19. The commissioner may negotiate premium rates and coverage. The commissioner shall consider the cost of the plans, conversion options relating to the contracts, service capabilities, character, financial position, and reputation of the carriers, and any other factors that the commissioner deems appropriate. Each benefit contract must be for a uniform term of at least one year, but may be made automatically renewable from term to term in the absence of notice of termination by either party. A carrier licensed under chapter 62A is exempt from the taxes imposed by chapter 297I on premiums paid to it by the state. (b) All self-insured hospital and medical service products must comply with coverage mandates, data reporting, and consumer protection requirements applicable to the licensed carrier administering the product, had the product been insured, including chapters 62J, 62M, and 62Q. Any self-insured products that limit coverage to a network of providers or provide different levels of coverage between network and nonnetwork providers shall comply with section 62D.123 and geographic access standards for health maintenance organizations adopted by the commissioner of health in rule under chapter 62D. (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), a self-insured hospital and medical product offered under sections 43A.22 to 43A.30 is required to extend dependent coverage to an eligible employee's child to the full extent required under chapters 62A and 62L. Dependent child coverage must, at a minimum, extend to an eligible employee's dependent child to the limiting age as defined in section 62Q.01, subdivision 2a, disabled children to the extent required in sections 62A.14 and 62A.141, and dependent grandchildren to the extent required in sections 62A.042 and 62A.302. (d) Beginning January 1, 2010, the health insurance benefit plans offered in the nonrepresented employees compensation plan under section 43A.18, subdivision 2, and the managerial plan under section 43A.18, subdivision 3, deleted text begin mustdeleted text end new text begin maynew text end include an option for a health plan that is compatible with the definition of a high-deductible health plan in section 223 of the United States Internal Revenue Code. Sec. 14. new text begin BUILDING PERMIT NOT REQUIRED.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law, rule, or ordinance to the contrary, a building permit under the State Building Code is not required to construct a new perimeter eight-foot security fence and access controls at the BCA Maryland Building site enacted in Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 1, section 15, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall renumber the subdivisions in Minnesota Statutes, section 16C.02, in alphabetical order. The revisor shall make necessary cross-reference changes consistent with the renumbering. new text end